test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-tyonTS_gt-norm.yaml
     тёня+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: тёндась
     тёня+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: тённинзь
     тёня+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: тёндинзь
     тёня+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: тёндинзь
     тёня+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: тённаць
     тёня+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: тёндаць
     тёня+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: тёндонзь
     тёня+N+Tra: тёняӈэ
     тёня+N+Car: тёнясиˮ
     тёня+N+Equ: тёнядаремʼ
     тёня+N+Equ+Lat: тёнядаревʼ
